Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-617.01
Returned check or electronic payment not accepted; State Treasurer; state agency; assessment of charge; limitation.

Any time that the State Treasurer assesses a returned check charge or a charge for an electronic payment that is not accepted against a state agency, that agency may assess a charge to the payor of the check or the person who authorized the electronic payment. The charges assessed by the state agency shall be used to make payment to the State Treasurer and to reimburse the state agency for the assessments and any administrative costs incurred by the agency. The charge assessed by the State Treasurer or a state agency shall not exceed thirty dollars. The charge assessed by the State Treasurer shall be credited to the State Treasurer Administrative Fund.

Laws 2008, LB619, § 2.
July 18, 2008